Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Article 4. Insurance Continuation For Dependents With Disabilities

§ 26-22-401.
Required provision of individual or group policy or contract.

Any individual or group hospital or medical expense insurance policy or hospital service plan contract or medical service plan contract, delivered or issued for delivery in this state which provides that coverage of a dependent child of a policyholder or subscriber, or of an employee or other member of the covered group, as the case may be, terminates upon attainment of the limiting age for dependent children specified in the policy or contract, shall also provide in substance that attainment of the limiting age does not terminate the child’s coverage while the child is and continues to be both:

Incapable of self-sustaining employment by reason of intellectual disability or physical disability; and

Chiefly dependent upon the policyholder or subscriber, or the employee or other member of the covered group, as the case may be, for support and maintenance, provided proof of the incapacity and dependency is furnished to the insurer or hospital service plan corporation or medical service plan corporation by the policyholder or subscriber, or employee or other member of the covered group, as the case may be, within thirty-one (31) days of the child’s attainment of the limiting age and subsequently as the insurer or corporation requires but not more frequently than annually after the two (2) year period following the child’s attainment of the limiting age.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 174, §§ 1, 2; W.S. 1957, §§ 26.1-453.2, 26.1-453.3; W.S. 1977, §§

26-24-101

,

26-24-102

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 2008, ch. 70, § 1.

The 2008 amendment,

substituted “intellectual disability or physical disability” for “mental retardation or physical handicap” in (a)(i).

Laws 2008, ch. 70, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 7, 2008.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.